Massachusetts, session 194th, S2156.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 7C of the General Laws s hereby amended by inserting after
section 72, the following section:-
Section 73.
a. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Menstruating individuals,” any person who menstruates.
“Disposable menstrual products,” products used by menstruating individuals including,
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, and underwear liners.
b. The Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance shall maintain, in all real
property owned, rented or otherwise occupied by public agencies of the Commonwealth, free
of 2

disposable menstrual products in both public and private restrooms for use by menstruating
individuals, whether they are employees or members of the general public. Such products shall
be provided at no charge. Such products shall be available in a convenient manner that does not
stigmatize any persons seeking such products.
SECTION 2. Chapter 15A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 27 the following section:-
Section 27A.
a. As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Menstruating individuals,” any person who menstruates.
“Disposable menstrual products,” products used by menstruating individuals including,
but not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, and underwear liners.
b. Each public institution of higher education shall provide disposable menstrual products
to menstruating individuals in the restrooms of any such institution’s building at no cost. The
disposable menstrual products shall be available in a convenient manner that does not stigmatize
the individual seeking such products.
of 2